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DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 1IHD _-FTE)

DIAVH-01

DTC

62(1) | Shift Solenoid A Electrical (S 1)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
See page DI-135.

DTC No.

DTC Detecting Condition

Trouble Area

62(1)

The Engine & ECT ECU checks for an open or short circuit in
the shift solenoid valve S1 circuitwhenitchanges. (1 ~trip
detection logic)

The Engine & ECT ECU records DTC 62(1) if condition (a) or
(b) is detected once, but it does not light up check engine
warning light.

After Engine & ECT ECU detects condition (a) or (b) continu-
ously8timesormoreinone  -trip,itcausesthe checkengine
warning light light up until condition (a) or (b) disappears.
After that, if the Engine & ECT ECU detects condition (a) or (b)
once, it starts lighting up check engine warning light again.

(a) Solenoidresistanceis8 Q orless (shortcircuit) whenthe
solenoid is energized.

(b) Solenoidresistanceis 100k  Q ormore (open circuit) when
the solenoid is not energized.

* Openorshortinshift solenoid valve S1 circuit
« Shiftsolenoid valve S1
*Engineand ECTECU
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DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 1HD-FTE)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check transmission wire.
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PREPARATION:
Disconnect the transmission wire connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between S1 of transmission wire connec-
tor and body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)

NG> Go to step 3.

2 [ Measure resistance between terminal S1 and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU connec-
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tor.
E1 PREPARATION:
(@ Connect the transmission wire connector.
Enmme Enlmenhl] /eammem) (b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
lecszzes] BEE CHECK:

Measure resistance between terminals S1 and E1 of Engine
and ECT ECU connector.
OK:

Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN-38).

(See page IN-38).

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
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3 Check shift solenoid valve S1.

PREPARATION:
(@) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(¢) Remove the shift solenoid valve S1.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the solenoid connector termi-
nal and the body ground.
OK:
Resistance: 11 - 15 Q at 20°C (68°F)
CHECK:
Connect the battery positive lead to the solenoid connector ter-
minal and the battery negative lead to the solenoid body
ground.
OK:
Solenoid sounds operation noise.

NG Replace the shift solenoid valve S1
(See page AT-8).

@

Repair or replace the transmission wire
(See page AT-6).
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